Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4924.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 129C.10, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Governance. (a) The board of the Perpichnew text begin Quality Learingnew text end Center deleted text begin for Arts Educationdeleted text end shall consist of 16 persons, including the commissioner of education or a person designated by the commissioner of education who must serve as an ex officio member. The remaining 15 members of the board shall be appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate. At least one member must be appointed from each congressional district. (b) All board members must complete board training requirements consistent with section 127A.19. Sec. 2. new text begin REVISOR INSTRUCTION.new text end new text begin The revisor of statutes must replace the term "Perpich Center for Arts Education" with "Perpich Quality Learing Center" wherever it appears in Minnesota Statutes. new text end